Missouri, session 2026, SB1115.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 235.140, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 235.140,
to read as follows:
235.140. 1. At the general municipal election in the
year after the first full calendar year after the
organization of any district, and biennially at [the]
general [election] municipal elections thereafter, there
shall be elected by the voters of the district one member of
the board to serve for a term of six years. Nominations
[may] shall be filed with the [secretary of the board]
election authority for the jurisdiction in which the
district is located.
2. The candidates for board member shall be elected on
a separate nonpartisan ballot. The candidate receiving the
most votes shall be elected. Any new member of the board
shall qualify in the same manner as members of the first
board qualify.
3. At the first general municipal election to occur
after August 28, 2027, the elections for the seats of any
board members elected to a six-year term in 2022 or who have
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1115 2
been appointed to unexpired terms of members elected to a
six-year term in 2022, shall be held. At the third general
municipal election to occur after August 28, 2027, the
elections for the seats of any board members elected to a
six-year term in 2024 or who have been appointed to
unexpired terms of members elected to a six-year term in
2024, shall be held. At the fifth general municipal
election to occur after August 28, 2027, the elections for
the seats of any board members elected to a six-year term in
2026 or who have been appointed to unexpired terms of
members elected to a six-year term in 2026 shall be held.
✓